Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2211.01
Greatest economic need, defined.

Greatest economic need shall mean the need resulting from an income level at or below the poverty level as established by the Office of Management and Budget.

Laws 1991, LB 58, § 11.